District of Columbia statutes.
47-873

Computation of tax; annual adjustment; limitations — Cooperative housing associations.

(a)

For purposes of computing taxes on real property in the District of Columbia, Class 1 Property owned by a cooperative housing association shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed under § 47-811.

(b)

The credit shall not be allowed for Class 1 Property owned by a cooperative housing association if the Class 1 Property:

(1)

Has 3 or fewer dwelling units; or

(2)

Receives trash collection services provided by the Mayor other than the collection of recyclable materials provided pursuant to Chapter 10 of Title 8.

(c)

The credit shall be an amount equal to $60 multiplied by the number of dwelling units that are occupied by the shareholders or members of the cooperative housing association. The credit shall be adjusted annually beginning in the tax year beginning July 1, 1992, and ending June 30, 1993, and in each subsequent tax year, in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.

(d)

The credit shall be adjusted annually by the addition to the prior tax year credit of an amount equal to the percentage increase in the local Consumer Price Index for all items during the calendar year in which the tax year begins, rounded to the nearest whole dollar.

(e)

The amount of the credit allowed under this section shall not exceed the amount of property tax otherwise due.

History

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-180, § 4, 37 DCR 5039
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 108(b), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 504(c), 48 DCR 334
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1303(h), 49 DCR 11664

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-873.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-305, in subsec. (d), substituted “percentage increase in the local Consumer Price Index for all items” for “percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (‘CPI-U’) for all items, in the Washington, D.C. Standard Metropolitan Statistical Area,”.
D.C. Law 14-307 rewrote subsec. (a); and in subsec. (b), substituted “Class 1 Property” for “improved residential real property” in two different places.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(d) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1303(h) and 1304 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1303(h) and 1304 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1303(h) and 1304 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 14-307: Section 1304 of D.C. Law 14-307 provided: “Sections 1302 and 1303 shall apply as of October 1, 2002.”